Vermont statutes. Title 4 Judiciary
Subchapter 2. Superior Courts

§ 111.
Superior Court sessions.

When the business of a Superior Court cannot otherwise be disposed of with reasonable dispatch, by direction of the Administrative Judge, there may be held additional sessions of that Superior Court simultaneously with the regular session consisting of a presiding judge and one or more assistant judges, if available.

A Superior Court may be temporarily recessed or adjourned from the place designated for holding a regular term or session to another place having adequate facilities, when the regular facilities at the designated courthouse are not adequate.

The Administrative Judge may assign assistant judges, with their consent, to a special assignment in a court where they have jurisdiction in another county when assistant judges of that county are unavailable or the business of the courts so requires.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. March 29, 1972;

1979, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1981, No. 60

;

1983, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 27, 1984;

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 73, eff. May 24, 2000;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 111a.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 112.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§§ 113,
114.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 115.
Stated terms of Superior Court.

The Superior Court shall operate continuously irrespective of the term in which events occur. Terms are designated for purposes of determining the rotation schedule of Superior judges and the responsibility of a Superior judge once a term has expired. When at the expiration of a term a Superior judge is no longer assigned to a specified unit, the judge shall complete any matters that have been heard or taken under advisement for that unit. The Administrative Judge, pursuant to rules of the Supreme Court, may specially assign a Superior judge to continue to preside over one or more cases even though the judge is no longer assigned to the unit of origin of the case or cases. In the absence of such a direction or of an assignment made pursuant to subsection 73(c) of this title, a judge who at the end of a term is no longer assigned to a unit shall have no further responsibility for cases in that unit.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 15

, § 2;

1965, No. 51

, §§ 1-3;

1973, No. 106

, § 2, eff. May 25, 1973;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§§ 116,
117.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 118.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 119.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238.